Arkansas, session 2025, HB1379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-4-903(a)(1), concerning standard
reimbursements and special authorizations, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Except for special authorization by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State cabinet-level secretary, director, chief executive officer, or
chief fiscal officer of the department, board, or commission for which the
travel is incurred, reimbursement for meals and lodging while traveling on
official business of the state shall not exceed the maximum rates as
prescribed by the Federal Travel Directory published by the United States
General Services Administration.

/s/Beaty Jr.



*JLL113*
02-20-2025 11:40:43 JLL113